Tennessee, session 114, HB1081.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-32-101(g)(2)(B), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead:
(B) At the time of the filing of the petition for expunction at least:
(i) Three (3) years have elapsed since the completion of the sentence
imposed for the offense the person is seeking to have expunged, if the offense is
a misdemeanor or Class E felony;
(ii) Six (6) years have elapsed since the completion of the sentence
imposed for the offense the person is seeking to have expunged, if the offense is
a Class D felony; or
(iii) Ten (10) years have elapsed since the completion of the sentence
imposed for the offense the person is seeking to have expunged, if the offense is
a Class C felony; and
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-32-101(k)(1)(C), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(C) At the time of the filing of the petition for expunction at least:
(i) Three (3) years have elapsed since the completion of the sentence
imposed for the most recent offense, if the offenses were both misdemeanors or
a Class E felony and a misdemeanor;
HB1081
003171
- 1 -

(ii) Six (6) years have elapsed since the completion of the sentence
imposed for the most recent offense, if one (1) of the offenses was a Class D
felony; or
(iii) Ten (10) years have elapsed since the completion of the sentence
imposed for the most recent offense, if one (1) of the offenses was a Class C
felony;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 003171